Hawaii statutes.
§§708-891 to 708-893 [OLD] REPEALED.
L 2001, c 33, §§5 to 7.

§708-891 Computer fraud in the first
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of computer fraud in the first
degree if the person knowingly accesses a computer, computer system, or computer
network with the intent to commit the offense of theft in the first degree.

(2) Computer fraud in the first degree is a
class A felony. [L 2001, c 33, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 293, §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next